Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0887.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1310g. (1) The board of a school district or intermediate school district or board of directors of a public school academy, or its designee, must appoint 1 or more independent decision makers. A hearing required under section 1310d(5) must be conducted by the independent decision maker or independent decision makers. The independent decision maker or independent decision makers shall determine whether the pupil is to be subject to a suspension of more than 10 days, expulsion, or alternative placement for more than 10 days and make an alternative placement recommendation for the pupil, if appropriate. The independent decision maker or independent decision makers shall not do any of the following: (a) Conduct an independent investigation of the disciplinary incident. (b) Provide testimony at the hearing. (c) Present evidence at the hearing. (2) The independent decision maker or independent decision makers shall apply a preponderance of the evidence standard when rendering a decision under this section. (3) The independent decision maker or independent decision makers shall do all of the following at a hearing under section 1310d(5): (a) Disclose to a pupil that it is possible, under applicable law, that any testimony the pupil gives in the presence of law enforcement officers may be used against the pupil in a court of law at a future date. (b) Offer to the pupil, and the pupil's parent, legal guardian, or representative described in subsection (5), a closed hearing without the presence of the public, law enforcement officers, or security guards except as necessary for the safety of the participants in the hearing. (c) Invite input from the pupil, and the pupil's parent, legal guardian, or representative described in subsection (5), for each of the factors listed in section 1310d(1). (d) Make findings for each of the factors listed in section 1310d(1). (4) Subject to state and federal privacy laws, the independent decision maker or independent decision makers shall, at the close of a hearing described in section 1310d(5), notify the pupil and the pupil's parent or legal guardian of a decision under this section and, within not more than 2 school days after the close of a hearing described in section 1310d(5), shall submit a written report of a decision under this section to the pupil and the pupil's parent or legal guardian and the appointing board of the school district or intermediate school district or board of directors of the public school academy, or its designee, that must contain all of the following: (a) A finding of whether the evidence proves that the pupil committed the conduct in question. (b) A justification for the finding of whether the evidence proves that the pupil committed the conduct in question. (c) Clear and convincing evidence that the independent decision maker or independent decision makers considered each of the factors set forth in section 1310d(1). (d) An alternative placement recommendation for the pupil, if appropriate. (e) If an alternative placement recommendation is not appropriate, the rationale for that determination. (f) An explanation of the pupil's appeal rights and the appeal procedures. (5) A pupil has the right to be represented by an attorney or a non-attorney advocate at a hearing required under section 1310d(5). An attorney or a non-attorney advocate may participate in the hearing on behalf of the pupil and take any action the pupil is entitled to take. (6) The board of the school district or intermediate school district or board of directors of the public school academy, or its designee, shall give the pupil and the pupil's parent or legal guardian a copy of the report required under subsection (4), subject to state and federal privacy laws, in a form and manner that is consistent with the form and manner in which similar communication is provided to the pupil or pupil's parent or legal guardian, and, subject to state and federal privacy laws, notice by telephone and by mail or email of all of the following: (a) The disciplinary decision. (b) A reinstatement plan, if appropriate. (c) If a reinstatement plan is not appropriate, the rationale for that determination. (7) This section does not diminish any rights of a pupil under federal law. (8) Before implementing a disciplinary decision under this section for a pupil with an individualized education program, the board of a school district or intermediate school district or board of directors of a public school academy, or its designee, must invite the pupil to meet with the pupil's individualized education program team to determine how the school district, intermediate school district, or public school academy will provide a free and appropriate public education in a timely manner. (9) An independent decision maker appointed under this section must not be any of the following: (a) An individual who is directly involved in the education or care of the pupil for whom the hearing under section 1310d(5) is being conducted. (b) An individual who witnessed the alleged misconduct resulting in the hearing under section 1310d(5). (c) An individual who is involved in the investigation of the alleged misconduct resulting in the hearing under section 1310d(5). (d) An individual who is involved in providing a recommendation as to discipline for the pupil. This subdivision does not prevent an independent decision maker from rendering a determination under subsection (1). (e) An individual who has a personal connection or history of involvement with the pupil for whom the hearing under section 1310d(5) is being conducted that conflicts with the individual's ability to be impartial. (10) As used in this section: (a) "Alternative placement recommendation" means an individualized recommendation for a pupil to further the pupil's public education for the duration of the removal, including placement in any of the following: (i) Another school building. (ii) An alternative or disciplinary program. (iii) A cyber school. As used in this subparagraph, "cyber school" means that term as defined in section 551. (iv) An alternative, disciplinary, or virtual program offered by the school district in which the pupil is enrolled or was enrolled before the removal, a neighboring school district, or by an intermediate school district. (v) Home-based or community-based instruction with district-provided curriculum. (vi) An adult education program. (vii) A community college if a dual-enrollment relationship exists. (b) "Individualized education program" means that term as defined in section 1414 of the individuals with disabilities education act, 20 USC 1414. (c) "Individualized education program team" means that term as defined in section 1414 of the individuals with disabilities education act, 20 USC 1414. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) Senate Bill No. 886. (b) Senate Bill No. 888.